Maryland, session 2025, SB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
1–101.
(a) In this Division I of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(b) “Appointing authority” means an individual or a unit of government that has
the power to make appointments and terminate employment.
(f) Unless expressly provided otherwise, “Department” means the Department of
Budget and Management.
(j) “Position” means an employment assignment of duties and responsibilities
that requires the full–time employment of one individual or less than full–time employment
of one or more individuals.
(k) “Principal unit” means:
(1) a principal department or other principal independent unit of State
government; or
(2) for an employee of a county board of elections whose employees are
covered by this article, the county board of elections.
(m) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Budget and Management.
(p) “State Personnel Management System” means the personnel system
established under § 6–101 of this article.
7–201.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE EXPEDITED HIRING
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) THERE IS AN EXPEDITED HIRING PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF HIRING ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS FOR VACANT
POSITIONS IN THE STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 1040 3
(2) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS, THE SECRETARY MAY
CONTRACT WITH ANOTHER ENTITY TO ASSIST WITH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
PROGRAM.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN
APPOINTING AUTHORITY:
(1) MAY RECRUIT FOR A VACANT POSITION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SHALL AIM TO COMPLETE THE RECRUITMENT AND APPOINTMENT
FOR THE POSITION WITHIN 40 DAYS.
(D) AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT FOR THE PROGRAM SHALL BE AN INDIVIDUAL
APPLYING FOR A VACANT POSITION IN STATE GOVERNMENT WHO:
(1) SELF–CERTIFIES AND, ON REQUEST, PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) WAS PREVIOUSLY EMPLOYED BY HAS SERVED IN THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR IN ANY CAPACITY, INCLUDING
DURING A PROBATIONARY PERIOD; AND
(2) (II) LEFT FEDERAL SERVICE AFTER JANUARY 15, 2025; AND
(3) (2) HAS RELEVANT FEDERAL EXPERTISE OR EXPERIENCE TO
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS, BASED ON THE POSITION DESCRIPTION, FOR THE
VACANT STATE POSITION.
(E) THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) ALTER DEVELOP GUIDANCE FOR APPOINTING AUTHORITIES ON
ALIGNING JOB TITLES AND POSITION DESCRIPTIONS FOR THE PURPOSE OF MAKING
THE POSITIONS APPEALING TO FORMER FEDERAL GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEES WITH
THE FEDERAL EQUIVALENT POSITIONS WITHOUT REQUIRING SUBSTANTIVE
CHANGES TO THE DESCRIPTIONS OR CLASSIFICATIONS OF THE POSITIONS;
(2) CONDUCT MARKETING AND RECRUITMENT ACTIVITIES TO
RECRUIT ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS FOR VACANT POSITIONS;
(3) RATE THE QUALIFICATIONS OF EACH APPLICANT WHILE A VACANT
POSITION IS OPEN;

SENATE BILL 1040
(4) COMMUNICATE WITH APPLICANTS THROUGHOUT THE HIRING
PROCESS TO MAINTAIN THE APPLICANTS’ INTEREST IN THE POSITION; AND
(5) DEVELOP A PROCESS TO REFER APPLICANTS TO OTHER VACANT
POSITIONS IN STATE GOVERNMENT; AND
(6) EXPLORE OPPORTUNITIES TO EXPAND THE PROGRAM TO
SUPPORT HIRING BY INTERESTED COUNTY GOVERNMENTS.
(F) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM IN PHASES, WITH INITIAL FOCUS ON
CRITICAL AND HARD–TO–FILL POSITIONS, AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY;
(2) ESTABLISH REASONABLE TIMELINES FOR EACH PHASE OF
IMPLEMENTATION; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) REVISE THE CONDITIONS FOR ELIGIBILITY UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO INCLUDE REVIEW OF APPLICATIONS FROM
FORMER FEDERAL CONTRACTORS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. It shall remain effective through April 30, 2026, and, at the end of April 30, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.